Utah, session 2026, HB75.
Section 1. Section 53F-5-601 is amended to read:53F-5-601. Definitions.As used in this part:(1)"American Indian and AlaskanAlaska Native concentrated school" means a school where at least 29% of the school's students are American Indian or AlaskanAlaska Native.(2)"Native American Legislative Liaison Committee" means the committee created in Section 36-22-1.(3)"State plan" means the American Indian and Alaska Native education state plan adopted under Laws of Utah 2015, Chapter 53, Section 7Section 53F-5-605.(4)"Teacher" means an individual employed by a school district or charter school who is required to hold an educator license issued by the state board and who has an assignment to teach in a classroom.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53F-5-602 is amended to read:53F-5-602. Program created.(1)(a)In addition to the state plan adopted under Laws of Utah 2015, Chapter 53, Section 7, beginning with fiscal year 2020-2021, there is created a program administered by the state board to provide grants targeted to address the needs of American Indian and AlaskanAlaska Native students.(b)The program shall consist of a grant program to school districts and charter schools to be used to fund materials, books, supplies, local and national conferences, stipends, recruitment, retention, and professional development of teachers who teach in American Indian and AlaskanAlaska Native concentrated schools.(c)In determining grant recipients for at least two-thirds of the money appropriated to the program, the state board shall give priority to American Indian and AlaskanAlaska Native concentrated schools located in a county of the fourth, fifth, or sixth class with significant populations of American Indians and AlaskanAlaska Natives.(2)Up to 3% of the money appropriated to the grant program under this part may be used by the state board for costs in implementing the program.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 53F-5-604 is amended to read:53F-5-604. Liaison -- Reporting -- Meeting.(1)Subject to budget constraints, the superintendent of public instruction appointed under Section 53E-3-301 shall appoint an individual as the American Indian-AlaskanAlaska Native Public Education Liaison.(2)The liaison shall:(a)work under the direction of the superintendent in the development and implementation of the state plan and the implementation of the state plan through local plans created and implemented by LEAs, except that the local plans shall reflect the vision and mission provided in Section 53E-2-301; and(b)annually report to the Native American Legislative Liaison Committee created under Section 36-22-1 regarding:(i)what entities receive a grant under this part;(ii)the effectiveness of the expenditures of grant money; and(iii)implementation of the state plan; and(iii)(iv)recommendations, if any, for additional legislative action.(3)The Native American Legislative Liaison Committee shall annually schedule at least one meeting at which education is discussed with selected stakeholders.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 53F-5-605 is enacted to read:53F-5-605. American Indian and Alaska Native education state plan.(1)By no later than January 1, 2027, the state board shall adopt, by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, an American Indian and Alaska Native education state plan to address the educational gap of the American Indian and Alaska Native students in the state.(2)The state plan shall:(a)identify the most critical academic needs of Utah's American Indian and Alaska Native students;(b)recommend a course of action to meet the identified needs;(c)be based on, and include, a summary of the best available evidence and most recent data;(d)focus on specific actions;(e)identify programs and resources that exist as of January 1, 2026, including the grant program created under this part;(f)prioritize more efficient and better use of the programs and resources described in Subsection (2)(e) to meet the needs of American Indian and Alaska Native students;(g)include ongoing reporting to the Native American Legislative Liaison Committee;(h)include a plan to hire, retain, and promote highly qualified teachers as quickly as feasible; and(i)include a process for sharing data with tribal education leaders.(3)Before adoption of the state plan, the state board shall present the proposed state plan to the Native American Legislative Liaison Committee.(4)In developing the state plan, the state board shall engage in meaningful consultation with stakeholders and tribal leaders within the state in a manner consistent with the Every Student Succeeds Act, Pub. L. No. 114-95, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.

Section 5:
Section 5.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.